Missouri, session 2026, HB1892.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 137.122, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 137.122, to read as follows:
137.122. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Business personal property", tangible personal property which is used in a trade
or business or used for production of income and which has a determinable life of longer than
one year except that supplies used by a business shall also be considered business personal
property, but shall not include livestock, farm machinery, grain and other agricultural crops in
an unmanufactured condition, property subject to the motor vehicle registration provisions of
chapter 301, property assessed under section 137.078, the property of rural electric
cooperatives under chapter 394, or property assessed by the state tax commission under
chapters 151, 153, and 155, section 137.022, and sections 137.1000 to 137.1030;
(2) "Class life", the class life of property as set out in the federal Modified
Accelerated Cost Recovery System life tables or their successors under the Internal Revenue
Code as amended;
(3) "Economic or functional obsolescence", a loss in value of personal property above
and beyond physical deterioration and age of the property. Such loss may be the result of
economic or functional obsolescence or both;
(4) "Original cost", the price the current owner, the taxpayer, paid for the item without
freight, installation, or sales or use tax. In the case of acquisition of items of personal
property as part of an acquisition of an entity, the original cost shall be the historical cost of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1892 2
those assets remaining in place and in use and the placed-in-service date shall be the date of
acquisition by the entity being acquired;
(5) "Placed in service", property is placed in service when it is ready and available for
a specific use, whether in a business activity, an income-producing activity, a tax-exempt
activity, or a personal activity. Even if the property is not being used, the property is in
service when it is ready and available for its specific use;
(6) "Recovery period", the period over which the original cost of depreciable tangible
personal property shall be depreciated for property tax purposes and shall be the same as the
recovery period allowed for such property under the Internal Revenue Code.
2. To establish uniformity in the assessment of depreciable tangible personal property,
each assessor shall use the standardized schedule of depreciation in this section to determine
the assessed valuation of depreciable tangible personal property for the purpose of estimating
the value of such property subject to taxation under this chapter.
3. For purposes of this section, and to estimate the value of depreciable tangible
personal property for mass appraisal purposes, each assessor shall value depreciable tangible
personal property by applying the class life and recovery period to the original cost of the
property according to the following depreciation schedule. The percentage shown for the first
year shall be the percentage of the original cost used for January first of the year following the
year of acquisition of the property, and the percentage shown for each succeeding year shall
be the percentage of the original cost used for January first of the respective succeeding year
as follows:
Year Recovery Period in Years
3 5 7 10 15 20
1 75.00 85.00 89.29 92.50 95.00 96.25
2 37.50 59.50 70.16 78.62 85.50 89.03
3 12.50 41.65 55.13 66.83 76.95 82.35
4 5.00 24.99 42.88 56.81 69.25 76.18
5 10.00 30.63 48.07 62.32 70.46
6 18.38 39.33 56.09 65.18
7 10.00 30.59 50.19 60.29
8 21.85 44.29 55.77
9 15.00 38.38 51.31
10 32.48 46.85
11 26.57 42.38
12 20.67 37.92
13 15.00 33.46

HCS HB 1892 3
14 29.00
15 24.54
16 20.08
17 20.00

Depreciable tangible personal property in all recovery periods shall continue in subsequent
years to have the depreciation factor last listed in the appropriate column so long as it is
owned or held by the taxpayer. The state tax commission shall study and analyze the values
established by this method of assessment and in every odd-numbered year make
recommendations to the joint committee on tax policy pertaining to any changes in this
methodology, if any, that are warranted.
4. Such estimate of value determined under this section shall be presumed to be
correct for the purpose of determining the true value in money of the depreciable tangible
personal property, but such estimation may be disproved by a taxpayer by substantial and
persuasive evidence of the true value in money under any method determined by the state tax
commission to be correct, including, but not limited to, an appraisal of the tangible personal
property specifically utilizing generally accepted appraisal techniques, and contained in a
narrative appraisal report in accordance with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal
Practice or by proof of economic or functional obsolescence or evidence of excessive
physical deterioration. For purposes of appeal of the provisions of this section, the salvage or
scrap value of depreciable tangible personal property may only be considered if the property
is not in use as of the assessment date.
5. This section shall not apply to business personal property placed in service before
January 2, 2006. Nothing in this section shall create a presumption as to the proper method of
determining the assessed valuation of business personal property placed in service before
January 2, 2006.
6. The provisions of this section are not intended to modify the definition of tangible
personal property as defined in section 137.010.
7. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, this section shall apply to all real property,
placed in service at any time, that is stationary property used for transportation or
storage of liquid and gaseous products, including water, sewage, and natural gas that is
not propane or LP gas, but not including petroleum products.
(2) To estimate the value of the real property described in this subsection, each
assessor shall value such property by applying a twenty-year recovery period to the
original cost of the property according to the twenty-year depreciation schedule set
forth in subsection 3 of this section. Notwithstanding subsection 5 of this section, the

HCS HB 1892 4
presumption as to the proper method of determining the assessed value of such property
shall apply regardless of when such property was placed in service.
(3) Each taxpayer owning real property described in this subsection shall
provide to an assessor, on or before May first of the applicable tax year, the original cost
and year placed in service of such property summarized in a format that is substantially
similar to the twenty-year real property reporting and valuation forms contained in
section 7.4 of the state tax commission assessor manual, revision date March 4, 2025, or
any other revision adopted by the state tax commission thereafter. Upon the written
request of the assessor, such information shall be provided for each taxing district
100 within the assessor's jurisdiction. If requested by the taxpayer, the assessor shall
101 provide to the taxpayer geographic information system maps in readable layers on
102 which a taxpayer may provide the information in this subsection. The taxpayer shall
103 certify under penalty of perjury that the information provided to the assessor under this
104 subsection is accurate to the best of the taxpayer's knowledge. All information provided
105 to an assessor under this subsection shall be considered proprietary information and
106 shall be accessible only to the assessor and the assessor's staff for internal use only.
✔